Washington statutes.
RCW 43.384.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Authority" means the Washington tourism marketing authority created in RCW 43.384.020.

(2) "Board" means the Washington tourism marketing authority board of directors.

(3) "Department" means the department of commerce.

(4) "Director" means the director of the department of commerce.

(5) "Statewide tourism marketing account" means the account created pursuant to RCW 43.384.040.

[ 2018 c 275 s 2.]